Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.040

May act as attorney, when.

A part-time district judge, if permitted by court rule, may act as an attorney in any court other than the one of which he or she is judge, except in an action, suit or proceeding removed therefrom to another court for review.

[ 1987 c 202 s 104; 1891 c 54 s 4; RRS s 55. Cf. Code 1881 s 3293.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Judge may not practice law: State Constitution Art. 4 s 19.